Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201618-2701
Act, how cited.

Sections 18-2701 to 18-2739 shall be known and may be cited as the Local Option Municipal Economic Development Act.

Laws 1991, LB 840, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 732, § 16;

Laws 1995, LB 207, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 827, § 9;

Laws 2012, LB863, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB1059, § 2.
July 21, 2016